Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1296XS (3) 91 lh/ko S.F. 363 Section 1. Section 249N.4, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. Fulfills all other conditions of participation in the 3 Iowa health and wellness plan, including member financial 4 participation pursuant to section 249N.7 , and community 5 engagement requirements pursuant to section 249N.9 . 6 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 249N.9 Member community engagement 7 requirement. 8 1. As a condition of membership in the Iowa health and 9 wellness plan, unless an eligible individual is exempt pursuant 10 to subsection 2, an eligible individual shall participate in 11 one of the following community engagement activities: 12 a. Work twenty hours or more per week, averaged on a monthly 13 basis. 14 b. Participate in and comply with the requirements of a work 15 program for twenty hours or more per week, as determined by the 16 department. 17 c. Volunteer twenty hours or more per week, as determined 18 by the department. 19 d. Meet a combination of work and work program participation 20 requirements for a total of twenty hours or more per week, as 21 determined by the department. 22 e. Participate in and comply with the PROMISE JOBS program 23 pursuant to chapter 239B. 24 2. The following eligible individuals shall be exempt from 25 the requirements specified in subsection 1: 26 a. An individual less than nineteen years of age. 27 b. An individual more than sixty-four years of age. 28 c. An individual medically certified as physically or 29 mentally unfit for employment. 30 d. A woman who is pregnant. 31 e. A parent or caretaker responsible for the care of a 32 dependent child under one year of age. 33 f. A parent or caretaker personally providing the care for a 34 dependent child with a serious medical condition or disability, 35 -1- LSB 1296XS (3) 91 lh/ko 1/ 3 S.F. 363 as determined by the department. 1 g. An individual receiving unemployment compensation 2 and complying with work requirements of the federal or 3 state unemployment compensation system as determined by the 4 department of workforce development and communicated to the 5 department. 6 h. An individual participating in a substance use disorder 7 treatment and rehabilitation program. 8 Sec. 3. MEDICAID DEMONSTRATION WAIVER REQUEST ââ COMMUNITY 9 ENGAGEMENT REQUIREMENTS FOR IOWA HEALTH AND WELLNESS PLAN. The 10 department, if required, shall submit a request within thirty 11 days of enactment of this Act to the centers for Medicare and 12 Medicaid services of the United States department of health 13 and human services for a section 1115 demonstration waiver to 14 require that, as a condition of membership in the Iowa health 15 and wellness plan, an eligible individual shall participate in 16 a community engagement activity as specified in this Act. 17 Sec. 4. COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT REQUIREMENTS FOR IOWA HEALTH 18 AND WELLNESS PLAN ââ IMPLEMENTATION. The department of health 19 and human services shall implement the provisions of this Act 20 no later than July 1, 2025. 21 Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 22 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 23